District of Columbia statutes.
42-3306

Findings required prior to termination of service.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any electric company, electricity supplier, gas company, or natural gas supplier to terminate service at the request of the owner, agent, lessor, or manager of an apartment house subject to this chapter, unless the Public Service Commission first makes a finding that all units within the apartment house are not lawfully occupied, or the Public Service Commission finds that services provided by such company shall be provided by other means.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any owner, agent, lessor, or manager of an apartment house from liability under a contract for the provision of services with an electric company, electricity supplier, gas company, or natural gas supplier until such time as the Public Service Commission makes its findings as required by subsection (a) of this section.

History

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-94, § 7, 27 DCR 3500
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 202(d), 47 DCR 1091
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 20(d), 51 DCR 10549

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-546.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-107 substituted “electric company, electricity supplier, or gas company” for “gas or electric company”.
D.C. Law 15-227 substituted “gas company, or natural gas supplier” for “or gas company”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 8(d) of Prevention of Unauthorized Switching of Customer Natural Gas Accounts Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-13, July 10, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 6589).